Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 7
ASSIGNMENT OF PARTNERSHIP INTERESTS

7-62-701. Nature of partnership interest.

A partnership interest is personal property.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

7-62-702. Assignment of partnership interest.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partnership interest is assignable in whole or in part. An assignment of a partnership interest does not dissolve a limited partnership or entitle the assignee to become or to exercise any rights of a partner. An assignment entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the distribution to which the assignor would be entitled. Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner ceases to be a partner upon assignment of all of the partner's partnership interest.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 445, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1445, § 141, effective July 1.

7-62-703. Rights of creditor.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the partnership interest of the partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the partnership interest. This article shall not deprive any partner of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the partner's partnership interest.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 446, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1445, § 142, effective July 1.

7-62-704. Right of assignee to become limited partner.

An assignee of a partnership interest, including an assignee of a general partner, may become a limited partner if and to the extent that the assignor gives the assignee that right in accordance with authority described in writing in the partnership agreement or all other partners consent.

An assignee who has become a limited partner has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities of a limited partner under the partnership agreement and this article. An assignee who becomes a limited partner also is liable for the obligations of the assignee's assignor to make and return contributions as provided in parts 5 and 6 of this article. However, the assignee is not obligated for liabilities unknown to the assignee at the time the assignee became a limited partner.

If an assignee of a partnership interest becomes a limited partner, the assignor is not released from the assignor's liability to the limited partnership under sections 7-62-207 and 7-62-502.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 446, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 86:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 457, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1445, § 143, effective July 1.

7-62-705. Deceased or incompetent individual partners - dissolved or terminated corporate partners.

If a partner who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction appoints a guardian or general conservator for the partner, the partner's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all of the partner's rights for the purpose of settling the partner's estate or administering the partner's property, including any power the partner had to give an assignee the right to become a limited partner.

If a partner is a corporation, trust, or other entity and is dissolved or terminated, the powers of that partner may be exercised by its legal representative or successor.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 446, § 1, effective November 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1446, § 144, effective July 1.